Utah statutes.
17-27a-604.5.   Subdivision plat recording or development activity before required improvements are completed -- Improvement assurance -- Warranty.

A land use authority may allow a land use applicant to proceed with subdivision plat recording or development activity before completing improvements required as a condition precedent to subdivision plat recording or development activity if:

(1)  the land use authority requires an improvement assurance that provides for:

(a)  an improvement assurance warranty for a period of up to:

(i)  one year after final acceptance of the improvement or warranty work; or

(ii)  two years after final acceptance of the improvement or warranty work, if the county:

(A)  determines for good cause that a lesser period would be inadequate to protect the public health, safety, and welfare; and

(B)  has substantial evidence of:

(I)  prior poor performance of the applicant;

(II)  unstable soil conditions within the subdivision or development area; or

(III)  extreme fluctuations in climatic conditions that would render impracticable the discovery of substandard or defective performance within a one-year period; and

(b)  a partial release of the improvement assurance, if appropriate; and

(2)  the land use authority establishes objective inspection standards for final acceptance of the required improvements.

